Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2407
Act; applicability.

The Prompt Payment Act shall not apply to the following:

(1) Claims subject to a good faith dispute if notice of the dispute is conveyed to the creditor in writing before the time required for payment, except that the Prompt Payment Act shall take effect on the date that the dispute is resolved;

(2) Contracts related to highway or road construction, reconstruction, or maintenance; and

(3) Claims, contracts, or projects which are to be paid for exclusively with federal funds.

Laws 1988, LB 1079, § 7.